District of Columbia statutes.
10-804

Secretary of the Interior to sell certain real estate — Authorization.

The Secretary of the Interior, with the approval of the National Capital Planning Commission, is hereby authorized, in his discretion, for the best interests of the United States, to sell and convey, in whole or in part, by proper deed or instrument, any real estate held by the United States in the District of Columbia and under the jurisdiction of the National Park Service, which may be no longer needed for public purposes, for cash, or on such deferred-payment plan as the Secretary of the Interior may approve, at a price not less than that paid for it by the government and not less than its present appraised value as determined by him.

Aug. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 1211, ch. 449, § 4

History

1981 Ed., § 9-404.
1973 Ed., § 9-304.

Prior Codifications

The functions, powers and duties of the National Capital Park and Planning Commission were transferred to the National Capital Planning Commission by the Act of June 6, 1924, ch. 270, § 9, as added by the Act of July 19, 1952, 66 Stat. 790, ch. 949, § 1.

All functions of all officers of the Department of the Interior and all functions of all agencies and employees of such Department were transferred to the Secretary of the Interior, with power vested in him to authorize their performance or the performance of any of his functions by any of such officers, agencies, and employees, by 1950 Reorganization Plan No. 3, §§ 1, 2, 15 F.R. 3174, 64 Stat. 1262.

Transfer of Functions